Tennessee, session 114, HB2113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Cast iron cookware is designated and adopted as the official frontier cookware of
this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2113
011906
- 1 -